Utah statutes.
17D-2-108 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Other statutory provisions.

(1)  This chapter is supplemental to existing laws relating to a local entity's acquisition, use, maintenance, management, or operation of a project.

(2)  Except as provided in this chapter, a local entity or local building authority that complies with the provisions of this chapter need not comply with any other statutory provision concerning the acquisition, construction, use, or maintenance of a project, including:

(a)  a statute relating to public bidding; and

(b)  Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code.

(3)  A local building authority is, to the same extent as if it were a local district, subject to and governed by:

(a)  Title 17B, Chapter 1, Part 6, Fiscal Procedures for Local Districts;

(b)  Title 17B, Chapter 1, Part 8, Local District Personnel Management; and

(c)  Section 17B-1-108.



Enacted by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

